District of Columbia statutes.
4-214.04

Funeral allowance.

The family of the deceased may choose a funeral director or establishment to provide a funeral service from a list of forms that have signed agreements with the Mayor to provide such services. The Mayor shall pay a maximum of $450.00 for a complete funeral service including the burial plot.

Apr. 6, 1982, D.C. Law 4-101, § 1404, 29 DCR 1060
Sept. 26, 1995, D.C. Law 11-52, § 502(i), 42 DCR 3684
Aug. 1, 1996, D.C. Law 11-152, § 101(d), 43 DCR 2978
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-255, § 8(b), 44 DCR 1271
This section is referenced in § 4-214.03.
1981 Ed., § 3-214.4.
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(e) of Human Services Spending Reduction Temporary Amendment Act of 1995 (D.C. Law 11-29, July 25, 1995, law notification 42 DCR 4002).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(e) of the Human Services Spending Reduction Emergency Amendment Act of 1995 (D.C. Act 11-35, April 11, 1995, 42 DCR 1834) and § 2(e) of the Human Services Spending Reduction Congressional Recess Emergency Amendment Act of 1995 (D.C. Act 11-104, July 21, 1995, 42 DCR 4014).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 502(i) of the Omnibus Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1995 (D.C. Act 11-124, July 27, 1995, 42 DCR 4160).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(d) of the Emergency and Public Assistance Emergency Amendment Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-277, May 29, 1996, 43 DCR 2971).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 101(d) of the Fiscal Year 1996 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-335, August 1, 1996, 43 DCR 4256).